Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Chapter 32. Southeast Mississippi Industrial Council

§ 57-32-1.
Establishment; composition; qualifications, appointment and terms of office of members.

Any county having two (2) judicial districts and a population of fifty-six thousand, three hundred fifty-seven (56,357) according to the 1970 federal decennial census, together with any counties contiguous thereto, where the boards of supervisors of said counties, or any number of them, shall find and determine that the public convenience and necessity requires the same, as evidenced by a resolution duly adopted and entered on the official minutes of said boards of supervisors, may establish a planning, economic and industrial development council to be known as the “Southeast Mississippi Industrial Council,” hereinafter called the “council.” Said council shall be composed of three (3) resident citizens of each county participating in said council, who shall be qualified electors therein, appointed by the board of supervisors of each such county for terms of four (4) years, except as herein provided. Upon creation of said council, one (1) member shall be appointed from each county for a term of one (1) year; one (1) member shall be appointed from each county for a term of two (2) years; one (1) member shall be appointed from each county for a term of three (3) years. Any county becoming a participating member of the council after its creation shall appoint members in the same manner as set forth above. Each succeeding appointment to such council shall be for a term of four (4) years or until a successor is appointed and qualified.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 32, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1976).

§ 57-32-3.
Oath and bond of members; meetings; compensation of members.

Before entering upon the duties of the office, each member of said council shall take and subscribe the following oath: “I_______________, do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will faithfully support the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of the State of Mississippi, and obey the laws thereof; that I am not disqualified from being a member of Southeast Mississippi Industrial Council; that I will faithfully discharge the duties of the office upon which I am about to enter; so help me God.” In addition thereto, each member so appointed shall qualify by making a surety bond in an amount not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) indemnifying the council against malfeasance or misfeasance in office, the premiums on all such surety bonds being paid by the council. The members of said council shall meet at the regular meeting place of the board of supervisors of Jones County, Mississippi, within ten (10) days after the council is created, and shall elect from among their number a president, vice president and secretary-treasurer, and shall adopt a seal and such bylaws, rules and regulations as may be necessary to govern the time, place and manner for holding of subsequent meetings of the council and for the conduct of its business, not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter. The members of said council shall serve without salary or compensation; provided, however, that their actual reasonable expenses incurred in performance of their duties may be reimbursed, including mileage as authorized by law for state employees.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 432, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1976).

§ 57-32-5.
General powers.

The council may do anything within its power, not inconsistent with this chapter, to secure and further industrial and economic development of said counties, to advertise the natural resources and possibilities of the same, and to maintain and support the same.

The council is hereby expressly authorized and empowered to acquire by gift, purchase or otherwise, and to own, hold, maintain, control and develop real estate situated within the participating counties, either within or without the corporate limits of a municipality, for development, use and operation of one or more industrial park complexes referred to herein as “project”; and is further authorized and empowered to engage in works of internal improvement therefor, including, but not limited to, construction or contracting for the construction of railroad spur tracks, site improvements, water, sewerage, drainage, pollution control and other related facilities necessary or required for industrial use and development of said park complexes; and to acquire, purchase, install, lease, construct, own, hold, equip, control, maintain, use, operate and repair other structures and facilities necessary and convenient for the planning, development, use, operation and maintenance of said parks for industrial purposes, including, but not limited to, utility installations, except those communications and electric power utilities already certificated in the area by the Mississippi Public Service Commission, elevators, compressors, warehouses, and air, rail and other transportation terminals and pollution control facilities. For the development of such projects, the council, in its own name, is authorized and empowered to borrow money and contract for the borrowing of money, from time to time, as it may deem appropriate, and to pay interest upon such borrowed funds in such amount as it may negotiate, however, not exceeding such amount of interest as may be allowed to be paid under the provisions of Section 19-9-19, and to give as security for the payment of such indebtednesses deeds of trust or mortgages on all or any part of the real estate purchased, improved or benefited by the funds so borrowed. The council may, likewise, pledge the proceeds and revenues from any such project for the repayment of funds so borrowed. The pledge of any real estate or income from real estate held by the council shall be done only by order spread upon the minutes of said council after the affirmative vote of not less than two-thirds (2/3) of the members of the council. There shall be no personal liability of any member of said council for failure in the repayment of funds so borrowed.

The council is authorized and empowered to sell, lease, trade, exchange or otherwise dispose of industrial sites situated within any of such projects to individuals, firms or corporations, public or private, for industrial and warehouse use upon such terms and conditions, for such consideration, and with such safeguards as will best promote and protect the public interest, convenience and necessity, and to execute deeds, leases, contracts, easements and other legal instruments necessary or convenient therefor. The council is granted the power to sue and be sued in its own name.

Any industrial lease may be executed upon such terms and conditions and for such monetary rental or other consideration as may be found to be in the best interest of the public by the council by order or resolution spread upon its minutes authorizing the same. Any covenants and obligations of the lessee to make expenditures in determined amounts, and within such time or times, for improvements to be erected on the land by such lessee and to conduct thereon industrial or warehouse operations in such aggregate payroll amounts and for such period of time or times as may be determined and defined in such lease, and to give preference in employment where practicable to qualified residents of the counties constituting the council may, when included in such lease, constitute and be deemed sufficient consideration for the execution of any such lease in the absence of a monetary rental or other considerations, if found by the council and the board of supervisors of the affected county to be sufficient consideration and in the best interest of the public; any such instrument may contain reasonable provisions giving the lessee the right to remove its or his improvements upon termination of the lease.

The council is authorized and empowered to fix and prescribe fees, charges and rates for the use of any water, sewerage, pollution control or other facilities constructed and operated in connection with said industrial parks and to collect the same from persons, firms and corporations using the same for industrial, warehouse and related purposes.

Upon organization, the council is authorized and empowered to employ engineers, attorneys, accountants, technicians and consultants upon a fee or retainer basis, and such executive and administrative personnel and other employees as shall be reasonably necessary to carry out the duties and authority authorized by this chapter, and to determine their qualifications and duties and to establish compensation and other employment benefits as may be advisable to attract and retain proficient personnel. The council, in addition to all other authority, is authorized and empowered to purchase, sell and trade office equipment, to purchase necessary supplies, to purchase such equipment and vehicles as the council deems necessary for the economic and industrial development of the member counties and to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

The enumeration of any specific rights and powers contained herein, and elsewhere in this chapter, where followed by general powers, shall not be construed in a restrictive sense, but rather in as broad and comprehensive a sense as possible to effectuate the purposes of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 432, § 3; Laws, 1980; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1985, ch. 474, § 28; Laws, 1986, ch. 438, § 38; Laws, 1987, ch. 483, § 39; Laws, 1988, ch. 442, § 36; Laws, 1989, ch. 537, § 34; Laws, 1990, ch. 518, § 35; Laws, 1991, ch. 618, § 35; Laws, 1992, ch. 491 § 37, eff from and after passage (approved May 12, 1992).

§ 57-32-7.
Appropriation of funds for support of council; tax levy.

The board of supervisors of each county electing to be a part of this council is authorized to set aside, appropriate and expend moneys from the general fund for the purpose of securing funds with which to support and maintain said council. Prior to the board of supervisors securing an indebtedness of the council under this chapter, the board shall comply with the provisions of Section 19-9-11. Provided, however, any tax levied previously under Section 19-9-111 by any county may be collected and paid to the council created hereby if such tax has not already been paid to the appropriate industrial council. Provided further, that the board of supervisors of any such participating county may, by appropriate order, designate a specific portion of the sum of its appropriation, not to exceed the revenue derived from three-fourths (3/4) of one (1) mill, to be used by said council exclusively for industrial development of said county in any manner authorized by this chapter. The council is hereby authorized to receive and expend funds from the boards of supervisors of participating counties provided by taxation as aforesaid, together with any gifts, gratuities and donations from municipalities within any participating county and from any persons, firms or corporations desiring to make such donations. Such appropriations, gifts or donations shall be placed in such depository as the council may deem appropriate. Any funds designated by any county board of supervisors or the governing body of a municipality for exclusive use within said county shall not be commingled with any other funds, but shall be kept and expended separately.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976., ch. 432, § 4; Laws, 1986, ch. 400, § 46, eff from and after October 1, 1986.

§ 57-32-9.
Additional levy to secure indebtedness of council.

Any county electing to designate a specific portion of the levy authorized by this chapter to industrial development within such county may also pledge to continue to levy an assessment, not in excess of three-fourths (3/4) mill, against all of the assessed property in said county for a period of time no longer than twenty (20) years, in order to further secure any indebtedness of the council incurred pursuant to the granted authority under Section 57-32-5. Once the board of supervisors of any county has so pledged to levy such millage, not in excess of three-fourths (3/4) mill, the county shall be obligated to continue such levy until the indebtedness of the council for which the levy was pledged under the authority of this chapter has been paid in full, but in no case shall such levy continue in force longer than twenty (20) years. No county shall be obligated to continue any levy to pay off any indebtedness of the council the board of supervisors of such county, by appropriate order, shall have approved the borrowing of such money by the council for a specific purpose and shall have pledged to levy such assessment, not in excess of three-fourths (3/4) mill, for such specific indebtedness of the council.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 432, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1976).

§ 57-32-11.
Use of revenues or proceeds derived from council property.

Any revenues or proceeds derived from property purchased or acquired by the council with funds given or delivered to the council for a specific purpose shall be used exclusively for industrial development in the contributing county. Such funds shall not be commingled with other funds of the council, but shall be kept and expended solely for industrial development within the county specified, for the retirement of indebtedness on industrial property in such county. Once the indebtedness on any property acquired by the council with funds specified to be used in a certain county has been paid in full, the council shall execute a deed to such property to said county upon request to do so by resolution duly adopted by the board of supervisors of said county. In the absence of such request from the board of supervisors of such county the council shall continue to maintain the proceeds or revenues derived from such property in the separate fund to be used for industrial development exclusively within such county furnishing said funds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 432, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1976).

§ 57-32-13.
Public nature of funds; audit.

All funds secured and expended under the provisions of this chapter shall be public funds and the auditor of public accounts of the State of Mississippi shall audit the same as other public funds are now audited.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 432, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1972).

§ 57-32-15.
Reimbursement of millage under Homestead Exemption Laws.

Millage levied under the provisions of this chapter shall not be reimbursable under the provisions of the Homestead Exemption Laws, being Section 27-33-1 et seq.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 432, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1972).

§ 57-32-17.
Transfer to council of assets, funds and personalty of Southeast Mississippi Industrial Development Council.

After the creation of the Southeast Mississippi Industrial Council, the Southeast Mississippi Industrial Development Council is hereby authorized to transfer to the Southeast Mississippi Industrial Council any of its assets, funds and personal property.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 432, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1972).

§ 57-32-19.
Withdrawal by participating counties from Southern Mississippi Planning and Development District.

Any county electing to participate under the provisions of this chapter may not withdraw from the Southern Mississippi Planning and Development District for a period of five (5) years, if such county was a member of the Southern Mississippi Planning and Development District when this chapter was passed.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 432, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1976).